apertium-deu.deu.dix
<pardef n="Mädel__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Mädel__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Mafios/o__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oes</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Mafios/o__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oes</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="M/agd__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>ägden</l>     <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägde</l>      <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägde</l>      <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägde</l>      <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="M/agd__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ägden</l>     <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägde</l>      <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägde</l>      <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ägde</l>      <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>       <r>agd<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Magnet__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Mafioso">         <i>Mafios</i><par n="Mafios/o__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Mafioso">         <i>mafios</i><par n="Mafios/o__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Magd">            <i>M</i><par n="M/agd__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Magd">            <i>m</i><par n="M/agd__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Magnet">          <i>Magnet</i><par n="Magnet__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Matt">            <i>Matt</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Matt">            <i>matt</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Mädel">           <i>Mädel</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Mädel">           <i>mädel</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Office">          <i>Office</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Office">          <i>office</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Release">         <i>Release</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Release">         <i>release</i><par n="Mädel__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Salto">           <i>Salt</i><par n="Mafios/o__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Salto">           <i>salt</i><par n="Mafios/o__n_m_lower"/></e>
